Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2205
Case file and record; preservation.

The clerk of each of the courts shall maintain and preserve a case file and a record of all documents delivered to him or her for that purpose in every action or special proceeding. Retention and disposition of the records shall be determined by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act.

R.S.1867, Code § 884, p. 547;

R.S.1913, § 8553;

C.S.1922, § 9504;

C.S.1929, § 20-2205;

R.S.1943, § 25-2205;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 36.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.

Papers are filed in office of clerk of district court only when deposited with the proper officer in his office and received by him in his official capacity. Jolliffe v. City of North Platte, 139 Neb. 431, 297 N.W. 666 (1941).

This section requires the clerk of the trial court to file all documents delivered to him or her for that purpose. State v. Muse, 15 Neb. App. 13, 721 N.W.2d 661 (2006).